Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,133
Historical vehicles; emission controls; exempt, when; safety equipment; proper operating condition.

(1) Unless the presence of equipment specifically named by Nebraska law was a prior condition for legal sale within Nebraska at the time a specific model of historical vehicle was manufactured for first use, the presence of such equipment shall not be required as a condition for use of any such model of historical vehicle as authorized in section 60-3,131.

(2) Any historical vehicle manufactured prior to the date emission controls were standard equipment on that particular make or model of historical vehicle is exempted from statutes requiring the inspection and use of such emission controls.

(3) Any safety equipment that was manufactured as part of the historical vehicle's original equipment must be in proper operating condition.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 133;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 33.